Utah statutes.
63A-14-503.   Meeting of the commission for review of complaint -- Procedures.

(1)  No later than 10 days after the day on which a complaint is accepted under Section 63A-14-502, the chair shall:

(a)  except as provided in Subsection (2), schedule a commission meeting on a date:

(i)  no later than 60 days after the day on which the chair accepts the complaint; and

(ii)  no earlier than 40 days after the day on which the chair accepts the complaint;

(b)  place the complaint on the agenda for consideration at that meeting;

(c)  provide notice of the date, time, and location of the meeting to:

(i)  the members of the commission;

(ii)  the first complainant named in the complaint; and

(iii)  the respondent; and

(d)  provide a copy of the complaint to each member of the commission.

(2)  The commission may, by majority vote, change the date of the meeting for review of the complaint in order to accommodate:

(a)  a meeting described in Subsection 63A-14-602(2); or

(b)  necessary scheduling requirements.

(3)  The commission may conduct a vote to change the date of the meeting described in Subsection (2) by phone or electronic means if the members do not discuss any other matters relating to the complaint during the communication.



Enacted by Chapter 426, 2013 General Session

